Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Child Care and Placement Agencies

199.640.
Licensing of child-caring and child-placing agencies or facilities — License fees — Standards — Recordkeeping and reporting — Use of corporal punishment — Prohibition against hiring convicted sex offender — Confidentiality of records.

Any facility or agency seeking to conduct, operate, or maintain any child-caring facility or child-placing agency shall first obtain a license to conduct, operate, or maintain the facility or agency from the cabinet.

The cabinet shall:

Develop standards, as provided in subsection (5) of this section, which must be met by any facility or agency seeking to be licensed to conduct, operate, or maintain a child-caring facility or child-placing agency;

Issue licenses to any facility or agency found to meet established standards and revoke or suspend a license after a hearing in any case that a facility or agency holding a license is determined to have substantially failed to conform to the requirements of the standards;

Establish and follow procedures designed to ensure that any facility or agency licensed to conduct, operate, or maintain a child-caring facility or child-placing agency complies with the requirements of the standards on an ongoing basis.

Licenses shall be issued for a period of one (1) year from date of issue unless revoked by the cabinet. Each licensed facility or agency shall be visited and inspected at least one (1) time each year by a person authorized by the cabinet and meeting specific qualifications established by the secretary of the cabinet in an administrative regulation. A complete report of the visit and inspection shall be filed with the cabinet.

Each license issued shall specify the type of care or service the licensee is authorized to perform. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish fees that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, for the proper administration of licensure. The fees collected by the secretary shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to a revolving fund account for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section. The balance of said account shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each biennium.

The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing basic standards of care and service for child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies relating to the health and safety of all children in the care of the facility or agency, the basic components for a quality program, as referenced below, and any other factors as may be necessary to promote the welfare of children cared for or placed by the agencies and facilities. Standards established may vary depending on the capacity of the agency or facility seeking licensure. These administrative regulations shall establish standards that ensure that:
(5) (a)

The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing basic standards of care and service for child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies relating to the health and safety of all children in the care of the facility or agency, the basic components for a quality program, as referenced below, and any other factors as may be necessary to promote the welfare of children cared for or placed by the agencies and facilities. Standards established may vary depending on the capacity of the agency or facility seeking licensure. These administrative regulations shall establish standards that ensure that:

The treatment program offered by the facility or agency is directed toward child safety, improved child functioning, improved family functioning, and continuity and permanence for the child;

The facility or agency has on staff, or has contracted with, individuals who are qualified to meet the treatment needs of the children being served, including their psychological and psychiatric needs;

The facility or agency has procedures in place to ensure that its staff receives ongoing training and that all staff members who are required to do so meet all regional and national standards;

The facility or agency develops an integrated, outcomes-based treatment plan that meets the health, mental health, education, safety, and security needs of each child in its care;

The facility or agency has procedures in place to include parents, family, and other caregivers in a child’s treatment program;

The facility or agency has procedures in place whereby it evaluates its programs on a quarterly basis and documents changes in the program if the results of the review indicate a change is needed;

The facility or agency makes available quality programs for substance abuse prevention and treatment with providers licensed under KRS Chapter 222 as part of its treatment services;

The facility or agency initiates discharge planning at admission and provides sufficient aftercare; and

The facility or agency has written policies and procedures in place that outline the structure and objectives of cooperative relationships with the community within which it is located and the local school district, including outreach activities to be undertaken by the facility or agency to both develop and maintain those cooperative relationships.

The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing recordkeeping and reporting requirements and standards for licensed agencies and facilities that recognize the electronic storage and retrieval of information for those facilities that possess the necessary technology and that include, at a minimum, the following information relating to children in the care of the agency or facility:

The name, age, social security number, county of origin, and all former residences of the child;

The names, residences, and occupations, if available, of the child’s parents;

The date on which the child was received by the agency or facility; the date on which the child was placed in a foster home or made available for adoption; and the name, occupation, and residence of any person with whom a child is placed; and

A brief and continuing written narrative history of each child covering the period during which the child is in the care of the agency or facility.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations creating separate licensure standards for different types of facilities.

The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish practices and procedures for the inspection of child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies. These administrative regulations shall establish a uniform reporting mechanism that includes guidelines for enforcement.

Any administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to govern services provided by church-related privately operated child-caring agencies or facilities shall not prohibit the use of reasonable corporal physical discipline which complies with the provisions of KRS 503.110(1), including the use of spanking or paddling, as a means of punishment, discipline, or behavior modification and shall prohibit the employment of persons convicted of any sexual offense with any child-caring facility or child-placing agency.

All records regarding children or facts learned about children and their parents and relatives by any licensed agency or facility shall be deemed confidential in the same manner and subject to the same provisions as similar records of the cabinet. The information thus obtained shall not be published or be open for public inspection, except to authorized employees of:

The cabinet or of such licensed agency or facility in performance of their duties; and

A school or local school district in which a child is enrolling or currently enrolled, in order to identify and serve the educational needs of the child, in accordance with KRS 199.802.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 27; 1972, ch. 153, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1978, ch. 314, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 247, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 239, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 524, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 527, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 45, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 136, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 64, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

199.641.
Definitions — Payments to child-caring facility or child-placing agency.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Allowable costs report” means a report from each child-caring facility or child-placing agency that contracts with the department for services and includes all allowable costs as defined by the Federal Office of Management and Budget’s guidance, including Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and other information the department may require, utilizing cost data from each child-caring facility’s or child-placing agency’s most recent yearly audited financial statement;

“Department” means the Department for Community Based Services of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Model program cost analysis” means a report based on a time study, the allowable costs report, and other information required by the department from each child-caring facility or child-placing agency that contracts with the department for services that determines a statewide median cost for each licensed program category of service provided by child-caring facilities or child-placing agencies; and

“Time study” means the process of reporting the work performed by employees of child-caring facilities or child-placing agencies in specified time periods.

Subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (4) of this section, when the department chooses to contract with a child-caring facility or child-placing agency for services to a child in the custody of or committed to the department, the department shall make payments to that facility based on the rate setting methodology developed from the model program cost analysis. The department shall also assure that the methodology:

Provides payment incentives for moving children as quickly as possible to a permanent, continuous, stable environment;

Provides children who require out-of-home care or alternative treatment with placements that are as close as possible to their home geographic area and ensure continuity with their families, schools, faiths, and communities;

Provides appropriate placement and treatment services that effectively and efficiently meet the needs of the child and the child’s family as close as possible to the child’s home geographic area; and

Facilitates provider participation in the state Medicaid program established in accordance with KRS Chapter 205.

The department shall use the model program cost analysis as a basis for cost estimates for the development of the department’s biennial budget request.

The secretary shall, to the extent funds are appropriated, establish and implement the rate setting methodology and rate of payment by promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that are consistent with the level and quality of service provided by child-caring facilities. The administrative regulations shall also include the forms and formats for the model program cost analysis.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from soliciting proposals to improve or expand alternative services for children in the custody of or committed to the cabinet.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 297, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 153, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 307, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 190, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

199.642.
Staff members of child-caring facilities must submit to background checks in accordance with federal law and regulations — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, “staff member” means:

An individual who is employed by a child-caring facility or child-placing agency for compensation;

A contract employee or a self-employed individual whose employment directly involves the care or supervision of children or unsupervised access to children placed with the child-caring facility or child-placing agency; or

A volunteer or intern whose activities on behalf of a child-caring facility or child-placing agency involve the care or supervision of children or unsupervised access to children.

The cabinet shall require a staff member of a child-caring facility or child-placing agency to submit to background checks in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 671(a)(20)(D) and the implementing federal rules, including national and state fingerprint-supported criminal background checks by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The child-caring facility or child-placing agency staff member shall provide the staff member’s fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation after a state criminal background check is conducted.

The results of the national and state criminal background checks shall be sent to the cabinet.

The cabinet shall provide notice to a child-caring facility or child-placing agency if a staff member is eligible for employment not to exceed seven (7) business days after the date the staff member submitted fingerprints through a means approved by the cabinet to the Department of Kentucky State Police. The cabinet shall reissue notice of the staff member’s eligibility for employment subsequent to the cabinet’s receipt of additional information about the staff member, including a result from the rap back.

The cabinet may register a child-caring facility or child-placing agency staff member in the rap back system.

The request for background checks shall be in a manner approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may charge a fee to be paid by a child-caring facility or child-placing agency not to exceed the actual cost of processing the request.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

The requirements of this section shall apply to a child-placing agency only if a background check required under subsection (2) of this section can be accomplished electronically, pursuant to KRS 17.185.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2019, ch. 33, § 1, effective March 19, 2019; renumbered from § 199.8966 by 2020 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

199.645.
Administrative regulations for facilities and agencies caring for children before adjudication under KRS Chapter 630.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall issue and enforce administrative regulations specifically addressing the unique situation of child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies which provide nonsecure care for children during the preadjudication phase of proceedings under KRS Chapter 630. These facilities and agencies shall include those operated privately and those operated by units of local government. These administrative regulations shall include standards relating to the following:

Administration;

Personnel;

Training and staff development;

Recordkeeping;

Physical plant;

Security and control;

Safety and emergency procedures;

Sanitation and hygiene;

Medical services;

Food services;

Intake and classification;

Programs and services;

Resident rights;

Rules and discipline;

Admission procedures;

Communication, including mail, visitation and telephone;

Release preparation and transfer programs; and

Volunteer involvement.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 183, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 139, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 154, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 538, § 3, effective April 13, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 191, effective June 20, 2005.

199.650.
Authorized activities of child-caring facilities or child-placing agencies — Child-caring facility to designate on-site official to apply reasonable and prudent parent standard.

Any licensed child-caring facility or child-placing agency may contract to provide care, maintenance, and services for a child in accordance with the terms of its license.

Any licensed child-caring facility or child-placing agency may receive children committed to its custody and provide care and services for the child until the child is discharged from custody pursuant to law.

Each licensed child-caring facility shall designate an on-site official who is trained and authorized to apply the reasonable and prudent parent standard as defined in KRS 199.011 in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 671.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 28; 1972, ch. 153, § 3; 2016 ch. 115, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

199.660.
Authorized activities of child-placing agencies — Registry of closed foster family homes — Restrictions on approvals of or placements in foster family homes — Collaboration to promote educational stability.

A licensed child-placing agency may place children in any licensed child-caring facility, including institutions and group homes, or in foster family homes under its direct supervision, in a facility certified by an appropriate agency as operated primarily for educational or medical purposes, or may place children for adoption if specifically authorized by its license to do so. The child-placing agency shall provide careful supervision of all children under its care and of children placed by it in child-caring facilities or foster family homes, and its agents shall visit such facilities or foster family homes as often as may be necessary to promote the welfare of the children.

A licensed child-placing agency shall notify the department within fourteen (14) calendar days of the closure of a foster family home under its supervision for any reason, and shall state the reason for the closure.
(2) (a)

A licensed child-placing agency shall notify the department within fourteen (14) calendar days of the closure of a foster family home under its supervision for any reason, and shall state the reason for the closure.

The department shall maintain a foster family home registry where this closure information, and closure information for all foster family homes closed by the cabinet, are stored.

A licensed child-placing agency shall not approve a foster family home, and shall not place a child into any foster family home, until the child-placing agency first requests information from the department to determine if the prospective foster family home is listed in the registry, if the foster family home has ever been closed, and the reason for closure.
(c) 1.

A licensed child-placing agency shall not approve a foster family home, and shall not place a child into any foster family home, until the child-placing agency first requests information from the department to determine if the prospective foster family home is listed in the registry, if the foster family home has ever been closed, and the reason for closure.

A licensed child-placing agency shall not approve a foster family home, and shall not place a child into a foster family home, which has been closed for cause by any other licensed child-placing agency or by the cabinet unless the foster family home has been successfully and continually operating as a cabinet foster family home for one (1) year after it was closed for cause by a licensed child-placing agency.

A licensed child-placing agency shall not approve a foster family home, and shall not place a child into a foster family home, which is under corrective action by any other licensed child-placing agency or by the cabinet at time of the closure unless:

The foster family home provides all information on the corrective action to the licensed child-placing agency;

The licensed child-placing agency fully addresses the foster family home’s corrective action in the foster family’s home study narrative; and

The department reviews and approves the foster family’s home study.

Licensed child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies shall collaborate with local school districts to promote educational stability for children under their care in accordance with KRS 199.802, and shall work to ensure that foster family homes under a child-placing agency’s supervision understand and actively support the educational needs of the children placed in their care through training, support, and supervision of the home by the child-placing agency.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 29; 1972, ch. 153, § 4; 2020 ch. 64, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

199.665.
Performance-based contracting for child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies — Study group — Implementation — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires;

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Performance-based contracting” means an approach that stresses permanency outcomes for children and utilizes a payment structure that reinforces provider agencies’ efforts to offer services that improve the outcomes for children; and

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The secretary shall designate a study group to make recommendations regarding the creation and implementation of performance-based contracting for licensed child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies in the Commonwealth.

The study group shall be composed of the following members:

The secretary;

The commissioner for the Department for Community Based Services;

The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or designee;

The executive director of the Governor’s Office of Early Childhood, or designee;

One (1) adult who was a former foster child in the Commonwealth;

One (1) adult who is a current or former foster parent in the Commonwealth;

Two (2) employees of a licensed child-placing agency;

Two (2) employees of a licensed child-caring facility; and

Any personnel within the Department for Community Based Services that the secretary deems necessary.

In its deliberations, the study group shall include but not be limited to analysis of improved timeliness and likelihood of permanency such as reunification, adoption, or guardianship; fewer moves for children in foster care; and reduced instances of reentry into care.

The study group shall report its recommendations by December 1, 2018, to the Governor, the Interim Joint Committees on Appropriations and Revenue and Health and Welfare and Family Services, and the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS 6.943. The study group shall cease to operate after the delivery of the recommendations required by this subsection.

By July 1, 2019, the cabinet shall:

Establish and implement performance-based contracting for licensed child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies that contract with the department for services; and

Apply and implement all standards, processes, and procedures established for performance-based contracting for licensed child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection to all other cabinet-operated programs that are like those operated by child-caring facilities and child-placing agencies.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 159, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

199.670.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of license of child-caring facilities or child-placing agencies.

The cabinet may revoke or suspend a license issued under KRS 199.640 for any deficiency or condition which would have caused a denial of the license in the first instance. The cabinet may refuse to issue a license in any case where the applicant is not found to meet the standards established by the secretary in an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with the provisions of KRS 199.640.

If the cabinet proposes to revoke or suspend, or to refuse to issue a license, written notice shall be given to the licensee or applicant, stating the proposed action and grounds therefor, and notifying the licensee or applicant that the license will be revoked, suspended, or refused unless the applicant or licensee makes a written request to engage in informal dispute resolution, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, or the applicant or licensee makes a written request for a hearing before the secretary within thirty (30) days of notice. Notice shall be complete and effective upon mailing. If the cabinet proposes to deny the issuance or renewal of a license, notice of the proposed action shall be provided to the licensee or applicant no later than thirty (30) days after the application for licensure or renewal is received by the cabinet.

If a request for a hearing is made, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the cabinet has probable cause to believe that an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare exists, the cabinet may take emergency action pursuant to KRS 13B.125.

Upon receipt of a statement of deficiency from the cabinet, the applicant or licensee may request one (1) informal opportunity per survey to dispute any deficiencies with which it disagrees. The applicant or licensee shall make a written request to the cabinet for informal dispute resolution, which must be received by the cabinet within ten (10) days of the receipt of the statement of deficiency by the applicant or licensee. The request shall:
(4) (a)

Upon receipt of a statement of deficiency from the cabinet, the applicant or licensee may request one (1) informal opportunity per survey to dispute any deficiencies with which it disagrees. The applicant or licensee shall make a written request to the cabinet for informal dispute resolution, which must be received by the cabinet within ten (10) days of the receipt of the statement of deficiency by the applicant or licensee. The request shall:

Specify the deficiencies in dispute;

Provide a detailed explanation of the basis for the dispute;

Include any supporting documentation, including any information that was not available at the time of the survey; and

If desired, request a face-to-face meeting with the regional program manager, or the manager’s designee, and a surveyor who did not participate in the original survey or the decision to issue the disputed deficiency.

Upon receipt of a request for informal dispute resolution, the regional program manager, or the manager’s designee, and a child-caring surveyor who did not participate in the original survey or the decision to issue the disputed deficiency shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the request, review the specific deficiencies in dispute and notify the applicant or licensee in writing of the results of the review. If a face-to-face meeting was requested by the applicant or licensee, the meeting shall be held, and no decision shall be made regarding the disputed deficiencies until after the face-to-face meeting has occurred.

If materials submitted by the applicant or licensee by mail or at the face-to-face meeting demonstrate that specific deficiencies should not have been cited, those deficiencies will be removed from the statement of deficiencies and any enforcement actions imposed solely as a result of those cited deficiencies will be rescinded.

If, after review of the disputed deficiencies, the regional office staff affirms the deficiencies, the licensee or applicant may accept the findings of the regional office staff and make any corrections required by the cabinet, or may, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice, request in writing a meeting with the secretary or the secretary’s designee. The secretary may designate an individual who holds the position of director or above to serve as the designee.

The secretary or the secretary’s designee shall meet in person with the licensee or applicant and review the documentation available within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request.

If the information provided demonstrates that specific deficiencies should not have been cited, those deficiencies will be removed from the statement of deficiencies and any enforcement actions imposed solely as a result of those cited deficiencies will be rescinded.

If the secretary or the secretary’s designee affirms the deficiencies, the secretary or the secretary’s designee shall, within fifteen (15) days issue a final written order stating the cabinet’s final position regarding the deficiencies in dispute. The decision of the secretary or the secretary’s designee shall be a final order for purposes of subsection (5) of this section.

A request for informal dispute resolution shall not delay the required submission of a plan of correction for any deficiency not in dispute. Any corrective plan of action or similar submission required by the cabinet relating to any deficiency in dispute shall be suspended until a decision is rendered and a corrective plan of action is agreed to within the informal dispute resolution process or the secretary or the secretary’s designee issues a final order.

Any final order may be reviewed in the Circuit Court of the county in which the child-caring facility or child-placing agency is located in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 30; 1972, ch. 153, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1974, ch. 315, § 26; 1980, ch. 114, § 37, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 89, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 527, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

199.680.
Nonreimbursement of out-of-state providers of residential care for children — Exception — Administrative regulations.

The Department for Community Based Services and the Department for Medicaid Services shall not reimburse an out-of-state provider of residential care for children whose care is paid by state general funds or state administered federal funds unless the Department for Medicaid Services or the Department for Community Based Services or a designated agent thereof has determined that there is no provider within the Commonwealth that is capable and willing to provide comparable services at a comparable cost per child to those that would be delivered by the out-of-state provider. An exception may be made if:

The identified in-state resource is farther away from the child’s parent or guardian than a similar out-of-state resource; or

The services offered by the out-of-state resource is deemed by either department or a designated agent thereof to be more appropriate for the individual child than the services offered by the in-state provider.

Prior to promulgating administrative regulations governing the determination of the availability of providers of residential care within the Commonwealth, the Department for Medicaid Services and the Department for Community Based Services shall establish uniform conditions, requirements, and exceptions for the determination of the availability of providers of residential care within the Commonwealth.

Each department shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that contains the uniform conditions, requirements, and exceptions for the determination of the availability of providers of residential care within the Commonwealth established under subsection (2) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 527, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 22, effective July 14, 2000.